North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-16.1 Operation of Water Resource Districts

61-16.1-01.
Legislative intent and purpose.

The legislative assembly of North Dakota recognizes and declares that the general welfare and the protection of the lives, health, property, and the rights of all people of this state require that the management, conservation, protection, development, and control of waters in this state, navigable or non-navigable, surface or subsurface, the control of floods, the prevention of damage to property therefrom, involve and necessitate the exercise of the sovereign powers of this state and are affected with and concern a public purpose. To realize these objectives it is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to provide for the management, conservation, protection, development, and control of water resources and for the prevention of flood damage in the watersheds of this state and thereby to protect and promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

The legislative assembly further recognizes the significant achievements that have been made in the management, conservation, protection, development, and control of our water and related land resources, and declares that the most efficient and economical method of accelerating these achievements is to establish water resource districts encompassing all of the geographic area of the state, and emphasizing hydrologic boundaries.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-02.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise provides:

“Affected landowners” means landowners whose land is subject to special assessment or condemnation for a project.

“Assessment drain” means any natural watercourse opened, or proposed to be opened, and improved for the purpose of drainage, and any artificial drain of any nature or description constructed for the purpose of drainage, including dikes and appurtenant works, which are financed in whole or in part by special assessment. This definition may include more than one watercourse or artificial channel constructed for the purpose of drainage when the watercourses or channels drain land within a practical drainage area.

“Commission” means the state water commission.

“Conservation” means planned management of water resources to prevent exploitation, destruction, neglect, or waste.

“Costs of the frivolous complaint” means all reasonable costs associated with the requisite proceedings regarding the removal of obstructions to a drain, removal of a noncomplying dike or dam, or closing a noncomplying drain, including all reasonable construction costs; all reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses; all reasonable engineering fees, including investigation and determination costs; compliance inspections; and necessary technical memorandum and deficiency review; and all costs associated with any hearing conducted by a district, including preparation and issuance of any findings of fact and any final closure order.

“District” means a water resource district.

“Frivolous” means allegations and denials in any complaint filed with a district made without reasonable cause and not in good faith.

“Project” means any undertaking for water conservation, flood control, water supply, water delivery, erosion control and watershed improvement, drainage of surface waters, collection, processing, and treatment of sewage, or discharge of sewage effluent, or any combination thereof, including incidental features of any such undertaking.

“Water resource board” means the water resource district’s board of managers.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2013, ch. 482, § 1.

Cross-References.

Definitions relating to drainage projects, see N.D.C.C. § 61-21-01.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

61-16.1-03.
Water resource districts — Boundaries. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 678, § 2.

61-16.1-04.
Minutes, books, and records.

The water resource board shall keep accurate minutes of its meetings and accurate records and books of account, clearly setting out and reflecting the entire operation, management, and business of the district. These books and records shall be kept at the principal office of the district or at such other regularly maintained office or offices of the district as shall be designated by the board, with due regard to the convenience of the district, its customers, and residents. The books and records shall be open to public inspection during reasonable business hours.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-05.
Bonds of treasurer and appointive officers.

The treasurer of a district shall be bonded in the amount set by the water resource board but the bond shall not be less than one thousand dollars. Other district employees shall be bonded in any amount set by the board. Every officer or employee of whom a bond is required shall be deemed bonded with the state bonding fund upon notice of that appointment given to the state insurance commissioner by the secretary of the district. Upon notification by the state bonding fund of the premium required, the district treasurer shall remit the same.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

Cross-References.

Bonds of district officers, see N.D.C.C. §§ 44-01-07 to 44-01-12.

State bonding fund, see N.D.C.C. ch. 26.1-21.

61-16.1-06.
District budget — Financial report — Tax levy — Financing by special assessment.

The fiscal year of the district begins January first and ends December thirty-first. The water resource board shall estimate the expenses of the district before October first of each year. Estimates of district expenses may include costs of rights of way, easements, or other interests in property deemed necessary for the construction, operation, and maintenance of any projects. The district budget may also include an amount necessary for future projects which are part of a master plan. In the year for which the levy is sought, a water resource board seeking approval of a property tax levy under this chapter must file with the county auditor of each county in the district, at a time and in a format prescribed by the county auditors, a financial report for the preceding calendar year showing the ending balances of each fund held by the water resource district during that year. Upon completion and adoption of a budget covering necessary expenses, the board shall send a copy of the budget to the county auditor of each county in the district. Each county auditor shall transmit the same to the board of county commissioners of that county. The board of county commissioners shall either disapprove the budget, amend and approve the budget as amended, or approve the budget as submitted and, if approved as amended or as submitted, the board shall, by resolution, levy and authorize and direct the county auditor to extend and spread upon the tax roll of the county or portion of the county in the district a tax not exceeding the limitation in section 57-15-26.6 in the same manner, and with the same effect, as general property taxes are extended and spread. Funds produced each year by the tax levy shall be available until expended, and if the tax levy in any year will not produce sufficient revenue to cover district expenses, a fund sufficient to pay the district expenses may be accumulated. The acquisition of rights of way, easements, and the construction, operation, and maintenance of a project in a district may, in the discretion of the water resource board, be financed in whole or in part by special assessments against property benefited by such project, or from revenues realized from general tax collections, or from net revenues to be derived from service charges to be imposed and collected for the services of the project, or any combination of such sources.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1983, ch. 606, § 103; 1985, ch. 676, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 70; 2015, ch. 92, § 23, effective January 1, 2016.

61-16.1-07.
District may issue warrants in anticipation of taxes levied to pay current expenses.

After a district has been established and organized and a water resource board has been appointed, the water resource board, for the purpose of paying current district expenses, including per diem, compensation, and expenses of managers and wages or salaries of officers and employees, by resolution, may authorize and issue district warrants in anticipation of and pending collection and receipt of taxes levied. The warrants shall bear the rate of interest set by the board, which shall not exceed twelve percent per annum on those issues sold at private sale. There is no interest rate ceiling on warrants sold at public sale or to the state of North Dakota or any of its agencies or instrumentalities. The district treasurer shall keep a register in which to enter each warrant issued, showing the date and amount of each warrant, the date of payment, and the amount paid in redemption thereof. All warrants shall be paid in order of their presentation for payment to the district treasurer. The warrants shall be drawn to the claimant or bearer in the same manner as a county warrant and shall be signed by the chairman of the water resource board and countersigned by the treasurer of the district. The aggregate total amount of warrants issued in any year to pay current district expenses shall not exceed eighty percent of the district’s tax levy for that year.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1.

61-16.1-08.
County treasurer to collect and remit taxes to district treasurer — Investment of district funds — Expenditure of district funds.

The treasurer of each county in which a district, or a part of a district, is situated shall collect all district taxes and special assessments together with any penalty and interest thereon in the same manner as county taxes are collected, and shall, within twenty days after the close of each month, pay to the treasurer of the district those taxes and assessments collected during the preceding month, and shall notify the secretary of the district of the payment. In June and December of each year, and as the county commission may otherwise require, the district treasurer shall report to each member of the water resource board the amount of money in the district treasury, the amount of receipts in the preceding month, and items and amounts of expenditures. At each regular meeting of the board the treasurer shall submit to the board a statement of the district’s finances.

Each district may invest any money in the district treasury, including money in any sinking fund established for the purpose of providing for the payment of the principal or interest of any contract, bond, or other indebtedness or for any other purpose, not required for the immediate needs of the district, in accordance with chapter 21-04.

Funds of the district shall be paid out or expended only upon the authorization or approval of the water resource board and by check, draft, warrant, or other instrument in writing, signed by the treasurer, assistant treasurer, or any other officer, employee, or agent of the district authorized by the treasurer to sign on behalf of the treasurer. The authorization shall be in writing and filed with the secretary of the district.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1985, ch. 677, § 1.

61-16.1-09.
Powers of water resource board.

Each water resource board shall have the power and authority to:

Sue and be sued in the name of the district.

Exercise the power of eminent domain as follows:

Except as permitted under subdivision b, the board shall comply with title 32 for the purpose of acquiring and securing by eminent domain any rights, titles, interests, estates, or easements necessary or proper to carry out the duties imposed by this chapter, and particularly to acquire the necessary rights in land for the construction of dams, flood control projects, and other water conservation, distribution, and supply works of any nature and to permit the flooding of lands, and to secure the right of access to such dams and other devices and the right of public access to any waters impounded thereby.

If the interest sought to be acquired is an easement for a right of way for any project authorized in this chapter for which federal or state funds have been made available, the district may acquire the right of way by quick take eminent domain as authorized by section 16 of article I of the Constitution of North Dakota, after the district attempts to purchase the easement for the right of way by:

Conducting informal negotiations for not less than sixty days.

If informal negotiations fail, the district shall engage in formal negotiations by:

Sending the landowner an appraisal and written offer for just compensation, which includes a specific description of the exact location of the right of way, by certified mail or commercial delivery requiring a signed receipt, and receiving the signed receipt or documentation of constructive notice.

Sending the landowner a written request for a meeting by certified mail or commercial delivery requiring a signed receipt if there is no agreement regarding compensation or no response to the written offer within fifteen days of receipt, and receiving the signed receipt or documentation of constructive notice.

Sending the landowner a written notice, by certified mail or commercial delivery requiring a signed receipt, of intent to take possession of the right of way if there is no agreement regarding compensation or no response to the written request for a meeting within thirty days of receipt, and receiving the signed receipt or documentation of constructive notice.

Any written communication to the landowner must include contact information for responding to the board and a description of the required negotiation timeline.

A district may not include or utilize any reference to quick take eminent domain during negotiations to acquire the necessary easement for a right of way. If formal negotiation efforts fail, the district shall request approval from the board of county commissioners of the county in which the right of way is located to take possession of the right of way by quick take eminent domain. After receiving the request, the county commissioners shall hold a public meeting and give the landowner thirty days’ notice of the meeting to allow the landowner to attend. After receiving verification from the district that there has been no reference or threat of quick take eminent domain by the district during negotiations, the commissioners shall vote on whether to approve the taking of the easement for a right of way using quick take eminent domain. If the county commissioners approve the use of quick take eminent domain by a majority vote, the district may take immediate possession of the right of way, but not a blanket easement, if the district files an affidavit by the chairman of the water resource board which states the district has fulfilled the required negotiation steps and deposits the amount of the written offer with the clerk of the district court of the county in which the right of way is located.

Within thirty days after notice has been given in writing to the landowner by the clerk of the district court that a deposit has been made for the taking of a right of way as authorized in this subsection, the owner of the property taken may appeal to the district court by serving a notice of appeal upon the acquiring agency, and the matter must be tried at the next regular or special term of court with a jury unless a jury be waived, in the manner prescribed for trials under chapter 32-15.

If ownership of a right of way has not terminated, ownership of a right of way acquired under this subdivision terminates automatically when the district no longer needs the right of way for the purpose for which it was acquired.

Accept funds and property or other assistance, financial or otherwise, from federal, state, and other public or private sources for the purposes of aiding the construction or maintenance of water conservation, distribution, and flood control projects; and cooperate and contract with the state or federal government, or any department or agency thereof, or any municipality within the district, in furnishing assurances and meeting local cooperation requirements of any project involving control, conservation, distribution, and use of water.

Procure the services of engineers and other technical experts, and employ an attorney or attorneys to assist, advise, and act for it in its proceedings.

Plan, locate, relocate, construct, reconstruct, modify, maintain, repair, and control all dams and water conservation and management devices of every nature and water channels, and to control and regulate the same and all reservoirs, artificial lakes, and other water storage devices within the district.

Maintain and control the water levels and the flow of water in the bodies of water and streams involved in water conservation and flood control projects within the district and regulate streams, channels, or watercourses and the flow of water therein by changing, widening, deepening, or straightening the same, or otherwise improving the use and capacity thereof.

Regulate and control water for the prevention of floods and flood damages by deepening, widening, straightening, or diking the channels or floodplains of any stream or watercourse within the district, and construct reservoirs or other structures to impound and regulate such waters.

Make rules and regulations concerning the management, control, regulation, and conservation of waters and prevent the pollution, contamination, or other misuse of the water resources, streams, or bodies of water included within the district.

Do all things reasonably necessary and proper to preserve the benefits to be derived from the conservation, control, and regulation of the water resources of this state.

Construct, operate, and maintain recreational facilities, including beaches, swimming areas, boat docking and landing facilities, toilets, wells, picnic tables, trash receptacles, and parking areas, and to establish and enforce rules and regulations for the use thereof.

Have, in addition to any powers provided in this chapter, the authority to construct an assessment drain in accordance with the procedures and provisions of chapter 61-21.

Acquire by lease, purchase, gift, condemnation, or other lawful means and to hold in its corporate name for its use and control both real and personal property and easements and rights of way within or without the limits of the district for all purposes authorized by law or necessary to the exercise of any other stated power.

Convey, sell, dispose of, or lease personal and real property of the district as provided by this chapter.

Authorize and issue warrants to finance construction of water conservation and flood control projects, assess benefited property for part or all of the cost of such projects, and require appropriations and tax levies to maintain sinking funds for construction warrants on a cash basis at all times.

Borrow money within the limitations imposed by this chapter for projects herein authorized and pledge security for the repayment of such loans.

Order or initiate appropriate legal action to compel the entity responsible for the maintenance and repair of any bridge or culvert to remove from under, within, and around such bridge or culvert all dirt, rocks, weeds, brush, shrubbery, other debris, and any artificial block which hinders or decreases the flow of water through such bridge or culvert.

Order or initiate appropriate legal action to compel the cessation of the destruction of native woodland bordering within two hundred feet [60.96 meters] of that portion of a riverbank subject to overflow flooding that will cause extensive property damage, or in the alternative, order, that, if such destruction is permitted, the party or parties responsible for the destruction must, when the board has determined that such destruction will cause excessive property damage from overflow flooding due to the erosion or blocking of the river channel, plant a shelterbelt which meets the specifications of the board. In the event the native woodland within such area has already been destroyed, the board may, in its discretion, order the planting of a shelterbelt which, in the judgment of the board, will curtail the erosion or blocking of such river channel where overflow flooding has caused extensive property damage. For purposes of this subsection, the words “riverbank” and “river channel” relate to rivers as defined in the United States geological survey base map of North Dakota, edition of 1963. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit, impair, or abrogate the rights, powers, duties, or functions of any federal, state, or local entity to construct and maintain any flood control, irrigation, recreational, or municipal or industrial water supply project.

Petition any zoning authority established pursuant to chapter 11-33, 11-35, or 40-47 or section 58-03-13 to assume jurisdiction over a floodplain for zoning purposes when such zoning is required to regulate and enforce the placement, erection, construction, reconstruction, repair, and use of buildings and structures to protect and promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the public within a floodplain area. In the event such zoning authority fails to act or does not exist, the board may request the state water commission to assist it in a study to determine and delineate the floodplain area. Upon completion of such study, the board shall make suitable recommendations for the establishment of a floodplain zone to all zoning authorities and the governing bodies of all political subdivisions having jurisdiction within the floodplain area.

Plan, locate, relocate, construct, reconstruct, modify, extend, improve, operate, maintain, and repair sanitary and storm sewer systems, or combinations thereof, including sewage and water treatment plants, and regulate the quantity of sewage effluent discharged from municipal lagoons; and contract with the United States government, or any department or agency thereof, or any private or public corporation or limited liability company, the government of this state, or any department, agency, or political subdivision thereof, or any municipality or person with respect to any such systems.

Develop water supply systems, store and transport water, and provide, contract for, and furnish water service for domestic, municipal, and rural water purposes, irrigation, milling, manufacturing, mining, metallurgical, and any and all other beneficial uses, and fix the terms and rates therefor. Each district may acquire, construct, operate, and maintain dams, reservoirs, ground water storage areas, canals, conduits, pipelines, tunnels, and any and all works, facilities, improvements, and property necessary therefor.

Coordinate proposals for installation, modification, or construction of culverts and bridges in an effort to achieve appropriate sizing and maximum consistency of road openings. The department of transportation, railroads, counties, and townships shall cooperate with the districts in this effort. Each district shall also consider the possibility of incorporating appropriate water control structures, where appropriate, as a part of such road openings.

Plug abandoned water wells and participate in cost-sharing arrangements with water well owners to plug water wells to protect aquifers from pollution or depletion, maintain pressure, and prevent damage to surrounding property.

Have, in addition to any powers provided in this chapter, the authority to conduct weather modification operations in accordance with the procedures and provisions of chapter 61-04.1.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1987, ch. 492, § 2; 1989, ch. 746, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 599, § 2; 1993, ch. 603, § 1; 2009, 597, § 1; 2017, ch. 421, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

61-16.1-09.1.
Watercourses, bridges, and low-water crossings.

A water resource board may undertake the snagging, clearing, and maintaining of natural watercourses and the debrisment of bridges and low-water crossings. The board may finance the project in whole or in part with funds raised through the collection of a special assessment levied against the land and premises benefited by the project. The benefits of a project must be determined in the manner provided in section 61-16.1-17. Revenue from an assessment under this section may not be used for construction of a drain or reconstruction or maintenance of an existing assessment drain. Any question as to whether the board is maintaining a natural watercourse or is constructing a drain or reconstructing or maintaining an existing assessment drain must be resolved by the department of water resources. All provisions of this chapter apply to assessments levied under this section except:

An assessment may not exceed fifty cents per acre [.40 hectare] annually on agricultural lands and may not exceed fifty cents annually for each five hundred dollars of taxable valuation of nonagricultural property; and

If the assessment is for a project costing less than one hundred thousand dollars, no action is required for the establishment of the assessment district or the assessments except the board must approve the project and assessment by a vote of two-thirds of the members and the board of county commissioners of the county in which the project is located must approve and levy the assessments to be made by a vote of two-thirds of its members.

If a board that undertakes a project finds the project will benefit lands outside water resource district boundaries, the board shall provide notice to the water resource board where the benefited lands are located together with the report prepared under section 61-16.1-17.

The board of each water resource district containing lands benefited by a project must approve the project and assessment by a vote of two-thirds of its members. The board of county commissioners in each county that contains lands benefited by a project must approve and levy the assessment to be made by a vote of two-thirds of its members.

If a project and assessment is not approved by all affected water resource boards and county commission boards, the board of each water resource district and the board of county commissioners of each county shall meet to ensure all common water management problems are resolved pursuant to section 61-16.1-10. In addition, the water resource board that undertakes the project may proceed with the project if the board finances the cost of the project and does not assess land outside the boundaries of the district.

All revenue from an assessment under this section must be exhausted before a subsequent assessment covering any portion of lands subject to a prior assessment may be levied.

Before an assessment may be levied under this section, a public hearing must be held and attended by a quorum of the affected water resource boards and a quorum of the affected boards of county commissioners. The hearing must be preceded by notice as to date, time, location, and subject matter published in the official newspaper in the county or counties in which the proposed assessment is to be levied. The notice must be published at least ten days but not more than thirty days before the public hearing.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 566, § 1; 2003, ch. 552, § 1; 2005, ch. 592, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 147, effective August 1, 2021.

61-16.1-09.2.
Release of easements — Procedure.

When it deems such action to be in the best interests of the district or other political subdivision, a water resource board or governing body of another political subdivision may release easements assigned to it from the state for the construction, operation, and maintenance of dams, along with access to the dams, if the dams are no longer useful.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 550, § 2.

61-16.1-10.
Responsibilities and duties of water resource board.

Each water resource board shall:

Meet jointly with other water resource boards within a common river basin at least twice each year at times and places as mutually agreed upon for the purpose of reviewing and coordinating efforts for the maximum benefit of the entire river basin.

Cooperate with other water resource boards of a common river basin and provide mutual assistance to the maximum extent possible.

Exercise jointly with other water resource districts within a river basin to effectively resolve the significant and common water resource management problem or problems of the river basin or region and to jointly develop a comprehensive plan for the river basin or region.

Encourage all landowners to retain water on the land to the maximum extent possible in accordance with sound water management policies, and carry out to the maximum extent possible the water management policy that upstream landowners and districts that have artificially altered the hydrologic scheme must share with downstream landowners the responsibility of providing for proper management and control of surface waters.

Address and consider fully in the planning of any surface water project the downstream impacts caused by the project. A determination of whether to proceed with the construction of a project shall be based on the following principles:

Reasonable necessity of the project.

Reasonable care to be taken to avoid unnecessary injury by fully considering all alternatives.

Consideration of whether the utility or benefit accruing from the project reasonably outweighs the adverse impacts resulting from the project.

Require that appropriate easements be obtained in accordance with applicable state and federal law when projects will cause an adverse impact to lands of other landowners.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1985, ch. 678, § 1.

61-16.1-11.
Joint exercise of powers.

Two or more districts may, by agreement, jointly or cooperatively exercise any power which is authorized a board by this title. The agreement shall state its purpose and the powers to be exercised, and shall provide for the method by which the power or powers shall be exercised. When the agreement provides for the use of a joint water resource board, the joint board shall be representative of the boards which are parties to the agreement. Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the agreement may specify the number, composition, terms, or qualifications of the members of the joint board. A joint board created under this section is a political subdivision of the state.

The districts which are parties to such an agreement may provide for disbursements from their individual budgets to carry out the purpose of the agreement. In addition, a joint board established pursuant to this section may adopt, by resolution, on or before July first of each year, a budget showing estimated expenses for the ensuing fiscal year and the proposed contributions of each member district as determined by the agreement. The boards of the member districts then shall levy by resolution a tax not to exceed two mills upon the taxable valuation of the real property within each district within the river basin or region subject to the joint agreement. The levy may be in excess of any other levy authorized for a district.

The proceeds of one-half of this levy shall be credited to the joint board’s administrative fund and shall be used for regulatory activities and for the construction and maintenance of projects of common benefit to the member districts. The remainder shall be credited to the construction funds of the joint board and shall be used for the construction and maintenance of projects of common benefit to more than one district.

Funds may be paid to and disbursed by the joint board as agreed upon, but the method of disbursement shall agree as far as practicable with the method provided by law for the disbursement of funds by individual districts. Contracts let and purchases made under the agreements shall conform to the requirements applicable to contracts and purchases by individual districts. The joint board shall be accountable for all funds and reports of all receipts and disbursements to the state water commission in a manner prescribed by the commission.

The agreement may be continued for a definite term or until rescinded or terminated in accordance with its terms. The agreement shall provide for the disposition of any property required as the result of a joint or cooperative exercise of powers, and the return of any surplus moneys in proportion to contributions of the several contracting districts after the purpose of the agreement has been completed.

Residence requirements for holding office in a district shall not apply to any officer appointed to carry out any agreement.

This section does not dispense with procedural requirements of any other statute providing for the joint or cooperative exercise of any governmental power.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1985, ch. 679, § 1; 2003, ch. 553, § 1.

Cross-References.

Joint exercise of governmental powers, see N.D.C.C. ch. 54-40.

61-16.1-12.
Scope of water resource board’s extraterritorial contractual authority — Board may acquire property in adjoining states and provinces.

A water resource board shall have the right, power, and authority to enter into contracts or other arrangements for water conservation, water supply, flood control, or other authorized projects with the United States government or any department thereof, with the Canadian government or any department thereof or any of its provinces or municipalities, with persons, railroads, other corporations, or limited liability companies, with public corporations, and state governments of this or other states, with drainage, water resource, conservation, conservancy, or improvement districts, or other such districts in this or other states. Such contracts or arrangements can provide for cooperation or assistance in planning, constructing, maintaining, and operating such projects and in making investigations and reports thereon, and for the carrying out of any other provision of this chapter. A water resource board may purchase, lease, or acquire land or other property in adjoining states or provinces to secure outlets to construct and maintain dikes or dams, or for other purposes authorized by this chapter and may let contracts or spend money for securing such outlets or works in adjoining states or provinces. No water resource board of any district shall have the right, power, or authority to connect boundary waters having different natural outlets by artificial means so that the waters of one may be discharged into the other.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 632, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

61-16.1-12.1.
Water resource boards — Agreements with state or federal agencies for certain improvements.

A water resource board may enter into an agreement with any federal or state agency, or any combination thereof, for the construction of a project, under the terms of which the contract for the work is to be let by the federal or state agency or any combination thereof. If under the terms of the agreement at least fifty percent of the total cost of constructing the project is to be paid by the agency or agencies and if any portion of the cost of the project is to be paid by the levy of special assessments, the board may by resolution create a project assessment district for the purpose of levying special assessments to finance the amount that the district will be obligated to pay in accordance with the agreement, over and above any other funds which are on hand and properly available for that purpose. The assessment district must be of a size and form as to include all properties which in the judgment of the board, after consultation with a registered engineer designated by the board for that purpose, will be benefited by the construction of the proposed project, and the board shall direct the engineer to prepare a map showing the boundaries of the proposed assessment district. The board shall by resolution declare the necessity of the project, set forth the general nature and purpose of the proposed project, estimate the total cost of the project, and the approximate amount or fraction of the cost which the district will be obligated to pay under the agreement, and the fact that this amount, or a lesser amount as the board may specify, is proposed to be paid by the levy of special assessments upon property within the assessment district determined to be benefited by the project. The board shall cause the resolution of necessity together with a copy of the map showing the boundaries of the assessment district and a notice stating the date and time by which the owners of any property liable to be specially assessed for the proposed project must file their votes on the proposed project with the secretary of the board to be mailed to each landowner affected by the proposed project as determined by the tax rolls of the county in which the affected property is located. The board may send the material by certified mail or by regular mail attested by an affidavit of mailing signed by the attorney or secretary of the board. The notice must also set forth the time and place where the board shall meet to determine whether the project is approved. The notice must also be published once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district and once in the official county newspaper of each county in which the benefited lands are located. Within five days after the first mailing of the resolution the board shall cause a copy of the resolution to be personally served upon any county, city, or township, in its corporate capacity which may be benefited directly or indirectly from the construction of the proposed project and upon any county which may become liable for any deficiency in the fund to be created for the project, by delivering a copy of the resolution to any member of the governing body thereof. The meeting must be held not less than thirty days after the mailing of the resolution, at which time the board shall determine whether the project is approved. If the board finds that fifty percent or more of the total votes filed are against a proposed project, then the board may not proceed further with the proposed project. If the board finds that less than fifty percent of votes filed are against the proposed project, the board may proceed with the project. In any assessment district created under this section the board may dispense with all other requirements of this chapter, other than those stated in this section. After the contract for the work has been let, the board may issue warrants on the fund of the project for the total amount of the cost thereof, and the board, without holding the hearing required by section 61-16.1-18, shall proceed to determine and levy any assessments against property benefited by the project and prepare an assessment list all in accordance with the procedures required by sections 61-16.1-21 through 61-16.1-24. The provisions of sections 61-16.1-25 through 61-16.1-36 are applicable to the assessments and the special warrants issued pursuant to this section.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 741, § 1; 1989, ch. 752, § 1.

61-16.1-13.
Master plans. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 678, § 2.